Title
Review for Dracula (1992)
Number of Reviews
18

Author
Eric Walker
    Francis Ford Coppola's newest film, BRAM STOKER'S DRACULA, is an
intelligent, well-made vampire movie that unfortunately spends too much
of its time looking good to be an effective, terrifying horror movie.
It looks great, and it's a tribute to the great Universal horror movies
of old (including the original DRACULA, starring Bela Lugosi and
directed by Tod Browning).  But pretty pictures do not a scary story
make, and this is the movie's ultimate weakness.  It's as undead as its
star.
     The movie tries to be a tale of tragic love, rather than a
straightforward horror story, but the scenery and atmosphere overwhelm
the actors so that you can't feel any emotion for any of them at all -
not even for Prince Dracula himself, whose heavy accent is
incomprehensible at times; nor for professor Van Helsing, who is
expertly played in a controlled, not quite over-the-top performance by
Anthony Hopkins.  The other actors in the film fare badly, turning what
could have been an emotional, intense tale of love, loyalty and humanity
into a silly soap-opera with pointy teeth.  The minor characters,
including Winona Ryder's Mina and Keanu Reeves' Jonathan Harker, exist
solely to be victims for the Prince or willing recruits in Van Helsing's
band of ghostbusters.  They have no emotions and feelings of their own,
and we never see them as true characters.  This robs the film of much of
its intensity.
     Coppola pays tribute to the famous German Expressionist horror
films (especially NOSFERATU, which is mentioned by name and which the
Old Prince resembles) and the classic Universal monster movies, giving
us lavish sets and special effects galore - but he loses control when he
includes surreal images of splashing blood and confusing "montage"
images that try to grip the audience but end up confusing them instead.
The movie's best moment is, in fact, an imitation of Coppola's own
famous climax to THE GODFATHER, in which a wedding takes place.  But
most of the scenes in the film are confusing, especially during a sea
voyage where people who have not read the book will only scratch their
heads and try to figure out what's going on.
     The best vampire stories have an erotic feel to them, as the
drawing of blood becomes more of a sexual act than a mere feeding on of
victims, though the eroticism of this movie is about as subtle as a blow
with a wooden stake.  The connection between feeding on victims and sex
is bludgeoned into us, using so heavy-handed an approach that even a
seduction/rape scene involving three women is nothing more than a
turn-off.  Coppola has invested so much time and effort into dazzling
the eyes that he has drained the film of heart and feeling, in much the
style of Stanley Kubrick.
     In the end, BRAM STOKER'S DRACULA fails to be the horrifying,
heart-stopping horror film it could have been.  It's a feast for the
eyes to behold, but underneath the sets, cameras and special effects
there's very little room for a person to *feel* anything.  As a result,
we don't care for the characters as much as we should - and a movie
without memorable, energetic characters is like one of the undead.  It's
a movie without a soul.

Author
Frank Maloney
     BRAM STOKER'S DRACULA is film directed by Francis Ford Coppola,
written by James V. Hart from the novel by Bram Stoker.  The film stars
Gary Oldman, Winona Ryder, Keanu Reeves, Anthony Hopkins, Richard E.
Grant, Cary Elwes, Bill Campbell, Tom Waits, and Sadie Frost.  Rated R,
due to violence, nudity, language.
     BRAM STOKER'S DRACULA is Francis Ford Coppola's earnest effort to
create the definitive Dracula movie.  He and his writer James V. Hart
(HOOK) have dragged in the epistolary style of the original novel by
having voice-over readings of various characters' journals and letters.
And despite obvious efforts to get away from the 1927 stage version, the
vehicle, by the way, that originally launched Bela Lugosi in his strange
career as Dracula, Hart has introduced his own novelties, such as
updating vampirism to a blood disease that has to bring the AIDS
infection to any modern viewer's mind as well as novelties in his
prologue and in the reincarnation theme.  Coppola and those who labor
for him cannot touch any source material without leaving Francis Ford's
fingerprints all over it.  And any pretense that this is the "real"
Stoker novel is as misleading as claiming that APOCALYPSE NOW was the
"real" HEART OF DARKNESS.
     Now whether the Coppola interpretation of the Dracula story sounds
like a good idea is up to you.  For this viewer, the combination is a
natural.  Coppola's great visual lushness and romanticism seem ideally
suited to a story that is the sine qua non of decadent eroticism.  And
to his credit, the romantic angle is decidedly the one being emphasized
here.  Not the horror, not the gore, not even the suspense -- after
Dracula leaves his castle and Keanu Reeves behind -- but the literally
immortal love story of Vlad the Impaler and his princess.  As a result,
this Dracula is the first really sympathetic one I've ever encountered
in a long life of devouring Dracula movies.  Dracula's death is a
supreme act of love reaching across the centuries.
     Overall, I'd have to say that Coppola's DRACULA is a mixed
blessing.  Much of it is fresh, clever, even witty.  It bogs down
somewhat under its own 123-minute running time.  Some of the
performances are problematical.  The visual element drives the story
element.  A lot of the story makes no literal sense.  But in the end,
Coppola has succeeded in capturing the very essence of the 1897 novel,
vampirism as a metaphor for society's fears of sex, especially female
sexuality (a theme interestingly resonant in these days of anti-gay
legal maneuvers and religious groups).
     Coppola's DRACULA is a complete document of this metaphor.  The
costumes of Eiko Ishioka (Dracula's gold robe reminded me of that
all-too familiar Gustav Klimt painting of The Lovers), the music of
Wojciech Kilar, the production designs of Thomas Sanders, and the
complexly edited film constantly using two or three superimposed images
all conspired to give the film its unique look.  And the makeup and
wigs, especially the wonderful transformations of Dracula himself, are
masterful and fascinating.  Everything is lush, overwhelming, sumptuous,
voluptuous, and charged with strange eroticisms.
     Of the actors the film belongs first to Gary Oldman, who played
Oswald in JFK and Joe Orton in PRICK UP YOUR EARS.  He is the perfect
casting choice, a highly eccentric actor in a stylized, artificial part
driven by the controlling metaphor of the film, turning caricature into
character and a tragic character at that.  As just one example of
Oldman's achievement let me refer those of you who've seen it to the
scene where Dracula helps Harker (Reeves) shave.  It chills me to just
think about it.
     Winona Ryder as Mina seems to me very much an old-fashioned movie
star.  She has the look and style, a somewhat anti-naturalistic style,
that perfectly suits the restrained passions of the Victorian millieu.
And her accent seems a lot less strained to these American ears than
that of Reeves in the part of Mina's fiance, Jonathan Harker.  Reeves's
presence strikes me as the biggest blunder in the film; he never
connects with his part of the restrained, repressed and ambitious clerk
of the London real estate firm.  He has a high charged encounter in
Dracula's castle, an encounter that is the most overtly sexual (in the
usual sense) in the film, and yet I never felt it really touched him.
     Of the second string, Anthony Hopkins is having the most fun as the
vampire-hunter Van Helsing.  This DRACULA never develops much of the
theme of a personal struggle between Van Helsing and Dracula, and as a
result Van Helsing is more comic relief than avenging angel.  A lot of
people are going to enjoy Hopkins's over-the-top and anti-Lectorish
performance.  I found it slightly tasteless and slightly offensive,
which is the opposite of my reaction to the parallel performance Alan
Rickman put in as the comic-relief Sheriff of Nottingham in ROBIN HOOOD:
PRINCE OF THIEVES, no one should expect consistency from me.
     Otherwise, Sadie Frost is fine as Mina's friend Lucy, who precedes
her into vampiric union with Dracula.  Cary Elwes is a pretty face as
Lucy's fiance, Richard E. Grant ineffective as one of the failed
suitors and morphine-shooting proprietor of a hellish insane asylum, and
Bill Campbell unintendedly comic as the oafish American suitor.  On the
other hand, Tom Waits is a fair treat as the insectivorous Renfield.  He
has a moment when he kisses Mina's fingers through the bars of his cell
that is pretty shivery in its own right, as well as in its echo of
SILENCE OF THE LAMBS.
     The first thirty minutes or so is the best: the prologue set in the
15th Century and the castle scenes before Dracula decamps for London.
Nothing that follows quite comes up those first thirty minutes for
originality and overall interest.  But the rest of the film is good
enough and in places for briefer periods approaches the level of the
opening parts.  This DRACULA achieves a quality of dreamlike lushness
and romanticism that makes it unique in the history of this subgenre.
It is erotic without a lot of overt nudity and naughty bits, it is
horrifying without a lot of the explicit gore of the usual horror film
(not that there isn't blood a plenty, but mostly just out of the frame).
Coppola has accomplished what he apparently set out to do, viz., to
redefine the vampire movie on the level of grand opera, just as he did
with APOCALYPSE NOW for the war movie and with GODFATHER for the
gangster movie.
     Consequently, I can recommend BRAM STOKER'S DRACULA to you, even at
full prices.

Author
Bernard Eric Cana
     Well, I went and saw Dracula last night at a sneak preview here at
my school.  Needless to say, it was ... umm ... "different."  I will say
that I thought it is worth paying $6 to go see.  But, then again, I'm
*very* biased to all Vampire movies.  -:)  Anyway, if you do not want to
know any more, DON'T READ ON!  For those who are interested, keep going.
     Okay, let me talk a bit about the actors first.  Gary Oldman does a
wonderful job on playing the good ol' count.  He was romantic, charming,
and downright nasty when he had to be.  The make up on him was *really*
good.  Trust me, I can see an Oscar for the make up or costume design.
Anthony Hopkins was *incredible* as Von Helsing!  Absolutely perfect!
As far as I am concerned, he was the star of the movie.  Very funny and
also very convincing.  Keanu Reeves was very wishy washy.  Just ignore
him.  -:)  Winona Ryder was cool.  She played a good role, but her lines
were kind of silly.  Though the "kiss in the maze" was interesting.
Just see the movie, you'll see what I mean.  -:)
     Okay, the directing and filming.  It was incredible!  Absolutely
amazing.  The special effects were definitely worth seeing!  This goes
along with the make up and such.  It must have taken forever to film it,
but it was worth it.  Oh, watch for a few things early in the movie:
Winona's eye twitch and watch the count's shadow when he's walking
around.  It's just *weird*!  The directing was interesting, but very
jumpy.  You *really* have to follow the movie to understand certain
things.  I did not like the background monologues and diary entries.  It
got annoying after a time.  Also, the number of overlapping scenes were
overdone.  Too many times when you would see two different scenes (i.e.,
Winona's character thinking about Dracula's homeland) at one time.
Though the one interesting thing was the "Tolkien-like filming" with a
battle scene.  In other words, puppets were used.  Reminded me of LORD
OF THE RINGS.  You'll understand what I mean.
     Finally, the actual story.  Not bad, but a lot of inconsistencies.
They used the original legend of Vlad Tepes, but never called him that.
They said that his *name* was Dracula, when it fact it was not.  Dracula
was derived from the Rumanian word for dragon, which was the family
symbol of Vlad and his armies.  Otherwise, it stuck pretty much to the
story.  It seems to be taken from *many* people's viewpoint and it was
easy to tell when someone was supposed to be important.  Look for
Winona's green dress to understand this.  The only thing I did not like
was how they changed this from a horror story to a romance story.  The
action was very limited and the ending was absolutely *horrible*!  Just
cheesy in my eyes.  
     I think that covers most of it.  In my overall view, it's worth
seeing it for the filming, not the storyline.  Hope you enjoyed this!

Author
Terri Buchman
     I couldn't decide whether Francis Ford Coppola's DRACULA was a
poorly done love story or an inept horror film.  I finally found it to
be neither, but rather a dull mismash of unconnected visual "moments"
that lacked both convincing acting and involving storylines.  My overall
score was a D+.
     I think the thing that really threw me out of this movie was the
excessive romanticism imposed on it.  I never felt that Gary Oldman and
Winona Ryder connected.  Coppola needed to have real sparks flying
between these characters for his romantic conceit to work and I found
their alleged passion dull and unfocused.  Mina Harker is supposed to be
the Drac's reincarnated love, a love so strongly felt that he would
endure centuries of living death rather than except god's judgement that
parted him from his love.  Yet Ryder's Mina is hardly a woman that is to
die for.  She is dull and self involved and the character never changes
from this sort of "lifeless" state.  The movie would have us believe
that something in her soul recognizes Drac as her ancient love, yet no
tone of voice, look of the eyes or impression of body language conveys
this critical recognition.  We are told to believe that meeting Drac
transforms this woman, freeing her repressed sexual desires.
Unfortunately none of this passion shows up on the screen.
     I also disliked the character of Dracula.  As written, it is a
confusing portrayal that never quite gels for me.  I believe that
Coppola's aim was to have the audience identify with the circumstances
that had made the man into the monster.  Unfortunately, it didn't work
for me.  I found Dracula silly and melodramatic, much more bathos than
pathos.  Oldman never convinced me that his character was a lover jilted
by god.  The only emotion that seemed to come across was a sort of bored
wistfulness.  The strong performance that the title character needed was
missing.
     I found most of rest of the cast extremely forgettable.  Keanu
Reeves sleepwalks through his part.  He is especially bad in the scenes
set in Castle Dracula with the three weird sisters.  Reeves seems to be
nearly comatose with excitement at the prospect of forbidden sexual
pleasures.  Anthony Hopkins' Van Helsing seems like he wandered in from
another movie, possibly a comedy.  The woman playing Lucy (Name escapes
me) is put in the odd position of portraying a vampire that was more
sexually alluring in life than in undeath (possibly a first in vampire
film history!).
     Many reviews have marveled over the effects in this movie.  I
found most of the effects pointless and unnecessary.  They distracted me
from the story and destroyed what little chance there was of connecting
with the characters.  This movie contains endless tracking shots that go
nowhere and special effects that are hardly even memorable, let alone
special.  I found Coppola's shadowplay mundane instead of menacing.
There is almost nothing frightening in this film.  
     In short I found this film dull and uninvolving.  It was poorly
written, acted and directed.  I'm afraid that I wouldn't even recommend
renting the video.  

Author
MILLER, JIMMY A.
    This is a review for Francis Ford Coppola's DRACULA.  There are a
few spoilers, so bail out now.
     Hrmm.  This film has some *MAJOR* problems during the first act.  I
honestly felt like getting up and walking out for a while.  Keanu Reeves
was painful to watch as the proper Englishman Jonathan Harker, and the
usually engaging Winona Ryder seemed quite stilted as Mina.  There were
bizarre effects involving shadows, movements, and visuals which seemed
not only out of place but frankly quite stupid.  Many of the visual
effects also seemed so utterly cheesy as to elicit laughter.  The use of
diary-style narration was jarring in the early going, and the movie was
quite slow to develop (let's leave out the bizarre armor they hung on
Vlad Dracul going out to battle the Turks).  The only characters worth
watching at all were Vlad himself and Mina's friend Lucy (played by
Sadie Frost), who were both interesting, engaging, and even sympathetic
(especially as the movie wore on).  
     Then Vlad comes to England, leaving Reeves to the tender mercies of
his vampiric harem (no joke, and I wish I had a bed like that).
Slowly, an entirely different movie begins to appear.  Ryder's Mina
becomes much more real, and the young version of Vlad manages to be both
menacing and seductive.  The other characters, though still lacking much
depth, at least begin to seem real in their words and deeds, and quit
acting like they just memorized their lines ten minutes beforehand.
Lucy, in fact, almost steals the show from Ryder (who in all truth
doesn't have much to do) in her portrayal of the girl being transformed
into a vampire.  Her seductiveness, sudden fears and fits made her real
and sympathetic, and made her eventual death(s) that much more
emotionally engaging.  
     Before Lucy finally fades, however, Antony Hopkins enters as
Abraham Van Helsing, and quite thoroughly takes command of the screen.
His very enjoyable, sometimes campy, sometimes foreboding performance
lifts the entire movie.  Reeve's reappearance after his escape from
Vlad's castle (why he is left alive is not really explained) seems to
take heart from Hopkins, and he actually turns in a credible performance
after this point.  
     The focus now on her character, Ryder does fine, though I honestly
felt something lacking.  This I found disappointing, as I'm a fan of
Ryder, and felt she could have done a better job.  Still, it suffices,
but only barely.
     Things finally start to move at the end, which a chase scene and
fight, plus a wry twist on things when Vlad chooses to be slain rather
than condemn Mina to life of the damned.  Despite all odds, this scene
somehow worked for me.
     The sets and costuming (with some jarring exceptions) were very
nice, and added to the feel of the film.  This movie has its problems,
most of which I'm tempted to plop into Coppola's lap.  Ridley Scott or
Tim Burton could have done much better.  That this movie succeeds at all
would seem to me to be in spite of Coppola, not due to any great vision
of his.  As I noted earlier many of the effects were not only
cheap-looking (and thus failed in that measure to create the mood they
were after) but unnecessary -- the blue fire rings, for example.
Puppet-like movements of figures in the battle scene.  Moving shadows,
etc.  The exceptions to this were the supernatural creatures -- the
vampires, the werewolf (it sure looked like one), and the accompanying
blood.  Those at least were well done.  Much of the acting was wooden
for far too long.  Some of the dissolves (like from Lucy's fang-marks to
the wolf eyes) are just plain stupid.  This movie is over-wrought and
top-heavy.  It only succeeds well in the scenes that contain some
eroticism.  
     I was quite disappointed.  This movie had some real potential but
something was lost somewhere along the way.  You had the feel of
*something* good straining to get through, but no dice.  Unlike BATMAN
RETURNS, which succeeded for me despite obvious flaws in the narrative,
DRACULA could not quite make the same visceral impression.
     I would not pay full price for this movie.  Try a matinee or some
other cut-rate time (and try not to squirm too much for the first thirty
minutes or so), or wait for video and fast-forward to the point where
Reeves is seduced by the female vampires.  You'll be happy you did.

Author
Jon Webb
     I liked DRACULA very much, almost enough to see it again.  It is a
film devoted to visual imagery, as usual with Coppola, but unlike some
of his earlier films (like COTTON CLUB) where the images seem added on
(and somewhat inappropriate) to a more or less ordinary plot, in this
film the plot is so fantastic that the images merely hint at the plot,
so giving viewers the opportunity to fill in details themselves, and
creating for themselves a richer experience, in the same way that a
painting may create a richer experience for the viewer than a photograph
of the same scene.
     This is largely a special effects movie; actors are secondary.  It
is interesting to note that this film eschews the increasingly popular
computer graphics techniques like morphing in favor of more traditional
methods.  This gives the film an older feeling, and also fits the mood
of the film, which is set in Victorian England.  The point of the film
seems to be the conflict between two cultures, the ancient one of
Transylvania and the war with the Turks and the (then) modern England.
Computer graphics would have placed us *in* Victorian England and made
us a participant in the culture rather than an outside observer, able to
see the conflict going on.
     I thought Gary Oldman did a fine job as Dracula, but it must be
noted that the makeup does an awful lot of the work for him in many
scenes.  One doesn't get any feeling of depth from any of the actors,
except Hopkins as Van Helsing; but that's probably the way the book was
written.  (Hopkins is great, by the way -- funny, exuberant, and
overjoyed at finally discovering his nemesis.)  Still, I would've liked
to see Winona Ryder display a little more quirkiness than she did here
as Mina; I think she has the potential, but perhaps she felt too
constrained.
     There are a lot of references to other Dracula films; any film buff
will enjoy these.  For example, the many forms Dracula takes are
undoubtedly references to the many shapes he's taken in different films;
I recognized him from NOSFERATU, for instance.
     All in all, this is a fun film, something like STAR WARS in its
quality and effective use of imagery, but also like it in its lack of
substance.

Author
Louis Butler
     Francis Ford Coppola has once again taken on the task of making a
movie from a classic book.  Where before he created a remarkable film
(APOCALYPSE NOW from HEART OF DARKNESS) this time he has not done quite
so well.  Bram  Stoker's novel is a chilling Gothic horror, recommended
reading for everyone.  What Coppola has done is remove the element of
horror from the story and transform it into a love story.
     Strangely enough, in terms of plot, this version follows the book
far closer than any Dracula movie I've seen.  There are some remarkable
inconsistencies, and the film feels as if it was not quite ready for
release.  The editing is choppy, there are incongruous scenes and scene
changes, and the occasional voice over.  These details add up to a
fairly steady diet of distractions.
     Oldman is a wonderfully powerful vampire.  His performance manages
to bring a certain sympathy, much as Karloff's Frankenstein's monster
did.  Dracula is not evil in this film, just misunderstood.  Perhaps
this film reflects our times in the belief that no one is evil, and no
one beyond redemption.  Interstingly enough, Oldman's undead Dracula
seems to be most alive of all the main characters, with the possible
exception of Hopkins' Van Helsing.
     Winona Ryder is disappointing.  Her performance is not poor, but
it is uninspired.  Though her character seems to be broiling in inner
turmoil, we know of it only through her diary.  The character of Lucy
was far better drawn by Sadie Frost.
     Keanu Reeves is just dreadful.  He is completely dull, and seems to
be walking through the role from start to finish.  By far the worst
performance in the movie.  I am quite disappointed, as I like Reeves,
but it is quite obvious that this role was far beyond his meager
abilities.
     Hopkins turns in an inspired performance as the good doctor, Van
Helsing.  He and Oldman make the film worth seeing.  He manages to be
humorous without quite crossing into something incongruous.  If you are
as impressed with Hopkins as I am, though, THE EFFICIENCY EXPERT allows
him a little more time on screen.
     Tom Waits (the singer?) plays Renfield, and does an amazing job
with him.  It's a shame he wasn't cast as Jonathan Harker instead of
Reeves; I'm quite sure he would have done a much better job.
     The problem with Dracula isn't so much the actors though, it is
that it does not quite work as a love story.  Perhaps it is a failing on
the part of Ms.  Ryder, but I believe it was more a problem with the
script.  The effects are very good (especially the shadows, which never
seem to be in sync with the Count) but still there is something missing.
If Coppola wanted to make a love story, he should have taken a hint from
the makers of GHOST and made us *believe*.
     Still, with all its problems, Dracula does have something going
for it.  Coppola's hand is evident throughout, and Oldman's performance
is compelling enough that I have no doubts the movie will be successful.
Come Oscar time, though, and Oldman is the only one deserving of any
recognition, though I wouldn't be surprised to see a nomination for
Hopkins anyway.  Of course I am not including the effects work, which
certainly deserves some accolades.  Oldman's makeup artists does some
amazing things, but in terms of major recognition, Gary Oldman is the
only actor who might deserve a nomination.

Author
Andrew Kuchling
     My foremost memory from this movie: The batlike form of the Count
has vanished, and the vampire hunters tense, waiting for the next
onslaught.  Soon enough, it comes; suddenly a horrid mass appears, a
shape of grey covered with pinkish--what, exactly?  Tentacles?
Worms?  The form remains standing long enough for memories of all the
myriad revolting creatures of Lovecraft's Cthulhu mythos to come 
rushing back, and then it collapses into a squirming mound of rats
which run in all directions, seeking for escape and darkness in which
to pool their various fragments of Dracula's evil.
     Point:  Movies, like all works of art and literature, are distant
mirrors in which we see our own concerns reflected.  Thus, an
optimistic person tends to put the most positive highlight on things,
preferring to see reminders of good in the most depressing tragedy;
other people also impose their own interpretations upon the story.  But
in order for this to be possible, a movie must be complex enough,
loosely structured enough, to allow us flexibility in twisting its 
events to our point of view.  Simple movies one can forget five minutes
after walking out of the theater; intricate movies can be brooded over
for weeks and watched repeatedly, increasingly pleasurable with each
viewing.  
     In my pretentiously ornate style, the previous paragraph is
leading up to my opinion that DRACULA is one such wonderfully
multi-leveled movie.  Coppola has managed to evoke many memories
throughout the movie; it resonates exactly with my subconscious,
reminding me of H. P. Lovecraft and Conan Doyle, of paintings and myths
and dreams.  Don't take any of this to mean the storyline is hard to
follow; scriptwriter James V. Hart has done his job very well and kept
me fascinated throughout the film's course.  I recommend it highly,
and suggest you see it at once, for I'm not sure how well it will do
at the box office.  I don't think The Phantom would like it much, since
while there are a few truly frightening moments, there is no sustained
terror building toward a climax.  Indeed, Prince Vlad (as perfectly
played by Gary Oldman) doesn't seem very terrifying; you feel sorry for
him, stuck in an undead state he no longer desires, pining for a dead
love.  This is not a classical horror film; it feels more like a
Dickens Dracula, a story of character development.  
 
     This is also not the Bram Stoker novel, either in the fine details
of the plot or in the approach.  This is not a portrayal of real events;
it is emphatically a film, designed to tell a story while adding subtext
to it.  As a train carrying Jonathan Harker passes through the
Carpathians, an eye appears in the sky to watch him.  Dracula's shadow
doesn't match the actions of his body, instead seeming to act out his
inner thoughts.  Scenes meld into one another;  dissolves leave just
enough overlap between transitions to blur the boundaries.  Humourous
juxtapositions are made, but you hate yourself for laughing when, just
after Lucy has been decapitated, we cut to a roast being carved in a
London public house.  Anthony Hopkin's Van Helsing has a knack for
inappropriate jokes, and there are numerous suspicious details in his
portrayal, actions and lines that lead me to  suspect an old connection
between him and his undead foe.  It is not a completely naturalistic
relation of events, and I fear this will alienate some audiences,
although I fervently hope I'm underestimating their tolerance of
cinematic games.   Expect long discussions of DRACULA in
rec.arts.movies, rivalling the "Deckard is a replicant" topics in length
of argument and counterargument.  
     Overall, this is not a movie to be missed.  It has immediately
leapt into my list of favorite movies, and I expect to be seeing it many
times.  Everything about BRAM STOKER'S DRACULA demonstrates Coppola's
mastery.  

Author
Ron Hogan
1)  The film's overture is set in the Middle Ages, during the Crusades.
Note that the setting is Eastern Europe, the porous region where the
East and West intermingle, where Europe gets its tastes of Eastern
exoticism, such as the Turks.  Dracula exists in this turbulent
middle ground and is profoundly changed by it.  It's not just God that he
rejects, but Western civilization.  He gives himself up entirely to the
mysterious Other that the East often represents.
2)  Much has been made about the degree to which this film is faithful
to Bram Stoker's novel.  Of course, the very heart of the text is
completely reversed, but in superficial form, the film does come closer
to the novel than any previous adaptation I can recall.  The multiple
points of view and forms of text are recreated in an effective, if
slightly disjunctive, style.  By the way, isn't it an interesting point
that the two major novels which lay the foundations for the horror genre
(the other being Mary Shelley's Frankenstein) are both epistolary and
from multiple points of view, and focus on the issue of knowledge of the
nature and identity of the Monster and ways to control it?
3)  I'd like to suggest that part of an explanation is that Frankenstein
comes out of the birth of English Romanticism, which leads by the end of
the century to Modernism, which is where I propose to situate Dracula.
This historical position is expressed in DRACULA through the
highlighting of the emerging technology: typewriters, phonographic
recorders, the cinematograph.  Also the tentative steps towards
psychology.  Another modernist touch is the emphasis on the text--not
only the diaries, but the maps, especially that map that hangs in
Dracula's castle, and the ancient manuscripts.  Look at the way that
these documents interface with the events of the film.  DRACULA has a
lot more in common with, say, PROSPERO'S BOOKS than most people would
notice.  It doesn't have as high a level of information density, and
it's more accessible, but the connection is there.
4)  It came up in conversation that this film, more than just about any
other in the last year or so, is screaming for an analysis through the
philosophy of Michel Foucault.  I'm not prepared to do such a reading of
DRACULA at this time, but I will suggest that the following books would
lead towards interesting elaborations: MADNESS AND CIVILIZATION, THE
HISTORY OF CIVILIZATION, DISCIPLINE AND PUNISH, and THE ARCHAEOLOGY OF
KNOWLEDGE.  This could probably give anybody enough of a start.  Maybe
I'll get around to it someday in the future (yeah, right).
5)  Well, I can at least mention sexuality.  It's a cliche that vampires
represent sexual desires, so I'll steer away from that and simply say
that the control of sexuality implied by the control of vampires is
evident in two particular scenes.  Van Helsing's lecture shows sexuality
as a subject of scientific investigation, a subject which can be
identified and regulated.  The illustrations in the Burton edition of
the Arabian Nights are another way in which sex becomes a classifiable
object; i.e.  these are the different types of sexual intercourse,
identified and categorized.  Keep in mind that Burton's interest was
more thn prurient--it was 'anthropological', to use a slightly
anachronistic term.
6)  Back to the vampire:  Gary Oldman was excellent in this role.  I
have to admit, though, that having recently rewatched JFK for a class
paper, I was seeing Oldman as Oswald more often than as Dracula.  It's
not entirely farfetched--Oldman, especially in his biographical roles
(Sid Vicious, Joe Orton, Lee Oswald, and arguably Dracula), portrays the
alienated outsider, the man cut off from and rebelling against his
culture, very well.  Dracula's destructive rage is much sleeker than
Oldman's other roles, but it ultimately draws from the same energies.
7)  Dracula is also the most recent member of a lineage of Coppola's
tragic protagonists, tainted and condemned by their struggles against
the dominant culture.  Michael Corleone's an obvious example, and one
that also reunited with God at the end.  Kurtz in APOCALYPSE NOW is
another potential; he also rejected civilization and retreated into pure
animalist, instinctual action and lust.  You could even make an argument
for Tucker, who is hunted down and destroyed by the auto industry and
the government (read: the vampire hunters) because of the threat to
their dominance over culture that he represents.
8)  While I'm drawing parallels between Coppola films, here's one: the
wedding of Jonathan and Mina and the scenes intercut with it (which I
don't identify so as not to be a complete spoiler) and the baptism of
Michael Corleone's son in THE GODFATHER.
9)  Cinema is quite possibly the modernist medium.  A movement that was
emphasizing mastery over the world through identification and awareness,
the act of seeing with one's own eyes, out of which emerges a medium
that (until sound was added) relied entirely on the visual.  According
to many early film theorists (especially Siegfried Kracauer, later Andre
Bazin, see also Bela Belasz), film's greatest power was its ability to
stand in for reality, to offer reality to the audience as a controlled
subject, but controlled in such a way that its inherent reality was not
violated.  As cinema grew, a language of cinematic forms emerged:
dissolves, silhouettes, etc., forms which reinforced a linear, rational,
narrative structure to film and to reality.  DRACULA reproduces much of
the early language of cinema, a language that has for the most part been
replaced by the rapid fire blitz of images for which we can thank
television, the post-modernist medium.  DRACULA is a deliberate
throwback to what cinema was, which is undoubtedly why so many critics
think the film is overblown.  (Well, it is in spots--but then, DRACULA
isn't an old film--it's the 1990s recreation of what Coppola thinks old
film were like)
10) Dracula rejected God and civilization.  Nobody specifically refers
to him as the Antichrist, at least not that I recall, but he's clearly
meant to fulfill that role.  And his final words with Mina, lifted from
an obvious source (again not revealed to prevent too much of a spoiler)
bring that point home.  Dracula's death (I don't really think of this as
a spoiler; I think we all know he dies) is not a defeat, in the same way
that the guilty verdict against Tucker was not a defeat, or that
Patton's death isn't a defeat (Okay, Coppola didn't direct PATTON, but
he co-wrote it).  I think of the end of DRACULA in much the same way
that I think of the end of Coppola's RUMBLE FISH and THE OUTSIDERS--the
king is dead, long live the king.  The cycle begun in the overture is
brought to the appropriate end.

Author
Mark R. Leeper
[This is the first of *many* reviews of BRAM STOKER'S DRACULA.  In general, I
try to keep the number of reviews per movie low, but it proved impossible to
decide which reviews to eliminate--so they're all here.  -Moderator]
     In 1922 F. W. Murnau made the first film version of DRACULA: NOSFERATU.
While the film really was a thinly veiled plagiarism of Bram Stoker's novel,
originally calling the vampire Count Orlock, the source of the material was
obvious.  What was unusual about Murnau's version was the expressionist,
almost surreal, world that Dracula/Orlock lives in.  Using the crude special
effects of the day, Murnau drops the viewer into a sinister world of strange
visual images.  Subsequent versions, with the possible exception of Werner
Herzog's 1979 NOSFERATU, tended to show the story in a more natural world.
There were good reasons for that, mainly dealing with budget, but also with
audience acceptance.  Bela Lugosi, John Carradine, up through Christopher
Lee, all play Dracula as a human-like creature with a few special powers,
while there was little question that Max Schreck's Count Orlock had
transformed into something really quite different from a human.  Francis
Ford Coppola has directed a new DRACULA for a new generation and has
intentionally way out-done Murnau and Stoker.  Coppola has claimed this
would be the dramatic version closest to Stoker's novel and nearly
succeeded, at least for accuracy of plot.  (The three-hour BBC COUNT DRACULA
and the one-hour premiere of Orson Welles's "Mercury Theater" radio program
were both versions more faithful than Coppola's.)  Stylistically, Coppola
has turned up the horror elements in a way to make the novel prosaic by
contrast.
     Presumably most people reading this review will already have a good
idea what the story is about.  The historic Dracula (literally "Son of the
Dragon") was also known as Vlad Tepes ("Vlad the Impaler").  He got his
first nickname because his father was Vlad Drakul ("Vlad the Dragon").
Don't believe the film's introduction that said he got the name for being in
the Order of the Dragon; he was not.  It was Vlad Drakul, Dracula's father,
who was in the Order of the Dragon.  Two more things not to believe: the
Vlads were Hungarian, not Romanian as they say in the introduction (borders
were different then from what they are now) and the impalements were
depicted wrong.  People were not impaled the short way, through the trunk.
Instead they were set on the stake using holes nature had already provided,
which is a slower and much more agonizing death.  This alone would have made
Vlad Dracula feared.
     Here is where fiction separates from reality.  Stoker's novel claims
the feared Dracula became a vampire who still terrorized Transylvania four
centuries later.  For reasons that have been left by Stoker to speculation,
the vampire Dracula has decided to migrate to England and to spread his
infectious vampirism to a new country.  The symptoms of an outbreak of
vampirism eventually come to the attention of a Professor Van Helsing who
recognizes what is happening and, with a small group of friends, checkmates
and eventually destroys the vampire.
     In spite of his professed fidelity to the novel, Coppola's version,
with a screenplay by James V. Hart, makes some basic revisions to the story.
Borrowing an idea that goes back at least to the 1933 Boris Karloff film THE
MUMMY.  Dracula, it seems, became undead because of his love for a woman
back when he was truly alive.  Centuries later Dracula is still around and
finds a reincarnation of this lost love.  Now he wants her for his lover
again.  Dracula becomes a tragic hero trying to regain lost love.
     Other revisions to the story include a complete transformation of the
character of Van Helsing.  In the book it seems to me he was cautious and
reserved, holding his tongue as long as possible.  The film makes him a sort
of mad professor who does not care about the impact of his statement and
likely to misbehave in strange and unpredictable ways.  Actually, much of
the conversation we hear is probably a good deal franker and more sexual
than would be likely in Victorian drawing rooms.  The same goes for the
public cinematograph showing nude women.  I have no doubt the pictures dated
from then, but probably would have been reserved for a less public venue.
Two more places where a bit more research might have been done: Mina
mentions Madame Curie as if her name was a household word in 1897.  It was
not until several years later that Curie would become famous.  Also Van
Helsing said that the "story of syphilis is the story of civilization" as if
it had been around as long as civilization.  Actually the first known case
was in 1493.  It is suspected of having originated in the New World mostly
due to the chronology.  No other European is even suspected of having
originated with native Americans, incidentally.  And even in this case, it
is known only that it came with Spanish mariners from some other port.
     As for the acting, it is fairly spotty.  Keanu Reeves seems out of
place and uncomfortable as Jonathan Harker.  Anthony Hopkins is a bit too
weird as Van Helsing.  Normally, I would call that the fault of the script,
but various interviews have indicated that it was Hopkins's idea.  Winona
Ryder really was not too bad as Mina.  Her British accent seemed acceptable
to me, though likely a Briton might have a different idea.  Of course, she
did squint her eyes in a scene in which she was supposedly dead.  Then there
is Gary Oldman as Dracula.  Lon Chaney, Jr., was a very plain-looking man
who, contrary to expectation, was the best character actor of his
generation.  That same description applies to the man who played Joe Orton,
Sid Vicious, Lee Harvey Oswald, and Dracula.  This understated actor's range
is incredible.
     But what sets this version apart from all other versions is the look.
One image after another is startling.  Time and again the camera plays with
us.  You find yourself wanting to view scenes a second time.  Your eye will
catch something funny in a scene.  Dracula's shadow may be just an instant
in timing slower than Dracula himself.  Transylvania is painted in bright
primary colors.  Out of a red sky you will make out two huge Draculine eyes
watching a character.  It could be a touch of German Expressionism.  The
battle scenes in the historic sequence borrow from Akira Kurosawa.
Throughout the entire film there is a dram-like quality, perhaps a
surrealism.  Coppola seems to have chosen to avoid computer effects such as
morphing.  While these effects might be effective for a science fiction
film, there is something about them that does not work in a pure horror
film.  It did not occur to me at the time, but that might be one reason that
FRIGHT NIGHT was not as effective for me as it could have been.
     The one problem with this version is the lack of actor empathy.  BRAM
STOKER'S DRACULA is for me more an artistic success than a good horror film.
It tells the story often with images more vital than Stoker used in his
novel.  As with Murnau's seminal version, scenes are very good, but the net
effect perhaps is less than the sum of the parts.  My rating is a +2 on the
-4 to +4 scale.

Author
The Phantom
     "Perhaps it was the Dristan," the Phantom thought to himself as he
left the theater.  Surely the film itself -- a big-budget, prestige film
made by one of our most talented and respected filmmakers -- couldn't
have been as bad as it seemed.  Worse than bad, really, for at times it
seemed downright incompetent, and if Coppola is anything at all, he's a
most able director who has worked successfully in several different
genres, from thriller to war film, crime drama to horror -- a man who in
fact is responsible for several of the best films of our time.
     So yes, it had to be an unforeseen side-effect of the cold
medication the Phantom had taken with his $2 Coke just before the film
started.  Perhaps its chemistry reacted badly with that of the "golden
topping" on the Phantom's $3 popcorn; perhaps the Phantom was still
suffering the after-effects of jet lag as his body struggled to cope
with the one hour time change between the Loews Astor Plaza in midtown
Manhattan and the suburbs of Chicago from which he had just arrived.  It
had to be something.
     Well, it *was* something: it was possibly the least competent
horror film and the biggest waste of time, money, and talent the Phantom
has witnessed in years.  In fact, even putting aside its dubious merits
as a horror film, BRAM STOKER'S DRACULA frequently failed even to be
nothing more than competent, unremarkable filmmaking.  It was, in short,
a terrible, horrific botch.
     That the film is also one of the most successful of the fall season
can only be attributed to the ever more apparent Verhoeven-ization of
America.  We are now, it seems, a nation of people who will watch nearly
anything at all as long as it is big-budget, Hollywood-style
entertainment featuring name-brand actors, buckets of blood, and just
enough naughty goings on to keep the prurient child in all of us up past
his bedtime.  Coppola's DRACULA is without a doubt the most successful
translation of Paul Verhoeven's formula -- perfected in the blockbuster
film BASIC INSTINCT -- to another genre.  
     Sadly, with the possible exception of musical comedy, it is perhaps
the genre for which the BASIC INSTINCT treatment is least appropriate;
for while any mediocre thriller can be enlivened by the odd ice-pick
killing or kinky sex scene, a good horror film must be subtle above all
else.  At first this may seem like a contradiction in terms -- after
all, if a horror film is to horrify us, mustn't it feature chainsaw
murders galore, buckets of blood, walking corpses, or some other equally
shocking special effects?  The answer is no, at least not if the film
has pretensions to be anything other than drive-in fodder.  The best
horror films do feature scenes of horror -- THE SILENCE OF THE LAMBS
would have seemed more like MY DINNER WITH ANDRE if Demme had left out
Hannibal Lector's jailbreak -- but those scenes are not what drives
them.  In fact, while the audience may be momentarily shocked by such
scenes -- may even find them unforgettable, as many did the infamous
shower scene in PSYCHO -- the grueling atmosphere of tension and fear
that audiences feel while watching the best horror films is generated by
all that builds up to those scenes, not by the scenes themselves, which
serve as a form of psychological release from the preceding tension.  If
a film is nothing but scene after scene of horror, it's really little
more than pornography: something that can be enjoyed only on the most
voyeuristic of levels.  What disturbed audiences about the classic
horror film HENRY: PORTRAIT OF A SERIAL KILLER was not so much the
scenes in which Henry kills someone -- there are enough of these scenes
in the film, true, but not really more than in any average horror film
-- but the scenes in which very little at all was going on.  In
particular, the scene in which Henry describes the circumstances
surrounding his mother's death is one of the most gripping -- and
horrifying -- in the film, and it touched audiences in just the way the
scenes featuring Dr.  Lector and Clarice Starling did in THE SILENCE OF
THE LAMBS.  No buckets of blood; no writhing naked female vampires; no
ice-pick killings, but great horror nonetheless -- in fact, because of
it.
     What we were promised when Coppola set out to bring yet another
version of Dracula to the screen was a return to Stoker's original text,
long and consistently ignored in screen adaptations of his work.  The
sixty years since the classic (and now somewhat quaint) version
featuring Bela Lugosi's elegant Count have allowed filmmakers to make
more explicit what was only implied in Stoker's tale.  That this is
hardly to anyone's benefit can be seen in Coppola's extended testimonial
to the efficacy of Karo syrup and Hollywood's special effects industry:
although the film is awash in blood, fancy costumes, miniatures, and
matte paintings from the moment the film begins to the moment it ends,
it's only after we leave the theater that we have time to wonder what
all the fuss was about.  For all the vaunted authenticity and loving
attention to detail that $42 million can buy, it would seem that Coppola
overlooked some frequently neglected but important aspects of his craft:
the ability to tell a coherent story and present credible characters and
motivations for those characters to the audience, and then allow the
audience to use its own imagination to fill in the details.  
     The best horror films -- in fact, the best films of any kind --
leave more to the audience's imagination than we may at first realize:
consider the infamous chainsaw scene in De Palma's SCARFACE, which many
people find too graphic to watch, but which few people realize features
nothing more than quick cuts between a chainsaw, the victim, and blood
on a shower curtain.  All the carnage is in their minds, where it
affects them so much more deeply than any amount of explicit on-screen
gore could.  Even though film is primarily a visual medium, explicitness
is nearly always dispensable when good writing and acting are available;
it's only when they're not that we get to see Michael Douglas' naked
rear end.  In the case of DRACULA, we get a two-hour definition of the
word "rococo" -- a word that until now the Phantom has reserved for use
as the ever-dependable answer to 14-across in the New York Times
crossword puzzle, but one which will from this moment on be inextricably
linked in his mind to images of over-decorated sound stages and young
female actresses who are alternately either over- or under-dressed
almost faster than the next bottle of Karo can be pressed into service.
     Whether Stoker's original novel had the problems Coppola's film
adaptation has is beside the point -- after all, a film is not a novel
and many sacrifices must be made in order to compress a sprawling
narrative into a screenplay for a film with a running length of just
under two hours.  The studio's publicity machine played up the
authenticity angle for all it was worth, and as a result many film
critics seem to have been bamboozled into believing that confusing,
poorly drawn characters, bad editing, and enough narrative for another
GODFATHER trilogy was a necessary price to pay so that we could finally,
for the first time in the history of the silver screen, enjoy on film
what Stoker originally was able to convey to us only on paper.  A
triumph, then, of research and period accuracy!  Amazing that Coppola
could achieve so much without the use of such non-authentic, modern
techniques as optical printing and other computer-aided special effects!
A visual feast of epic proportions!
     Well, so was BASIC INSTINCT, and the Phantom heard precious little
from these same critics about the visual feast Verhoeven presented to us
in the form of Sharon Stone.  While the Phantom has always been a phan
of Coppola's work (particularly his early work, including such
masterpieces of realism as THE CONVERSATION and THE GODFATHER), he
cannot for the life of him understand what happened between the time
Coppola read James V.  Hart's screenplay and the time the last bucket of
blood was tossed in the camera's general direction.  
     In fact, it would be easier to discuss what *isn't* wrong with
DRACULA than to review what is.  For all its faults, Coppola's film has
a lush, rich look that is very effective in setting the tone of the
film, dominated though it is by a heavy reliance on interiors, matte
paintings, and miniatures.  And in taking a page from Sam Raimi's book,
Coppola doesn't overlook any special effect or camera trick that would
have been possible before the introduction of computers into mainstream
filmmaking (so there is, thankfully, no T2-style morphing in the film).
Thus he gives us many strange points of view and unexpected movements of
the camera; several sequences in EVIL DEAD-vision (played as a homage to
the very few special effects in the 1922 silent classic NOSFERATU); and
many subtle and playful tricks for the eye, from shadows that don't, to
the Count himself, who doesn't always turn up where our rational senses
demand he should.
     But it's what he doesn't give us that makes the film so
disappointing.  Putting aside the screenplay (which is packed full of
enough exposition for three DRACULA films), Coppola's tendency to jump
us quickly from one scene to the next, then back again, then somewhere
else entirely; the dim lighting; the decision to shoot the entire film
inside a sound stage, giving the production a very claustrophobic feel;
and the miscasting of the film's principals all lead inexorably to the
very confusing and muddled result.  The film as structured is completely
dependent on the eventual emotional connection between Ryder and Oldman,
but for whatever reason this never happens -- and in any event, their
eventual meeting comes much too late in the proceedings to make much
difference at that point.  If the point of this version of the Dracula
legend is to play up the "Love Never Dies" aspect of the story --
certainly a promising new take on a shopworn old tale -- why is the
climactic meeting so delayed?  Coppola's answer seems to be that he
needed time to give us three or four other climaxes first, and while
each vignette plays out satisfactorily, we are hurled from one to the
next so quickly and abruptly that we lose any sense of continuity; by
the time the film has reached its final "climax" we can barely keep up
with the plot, let alone any of the characters who are tossed in for the
film's denouement.  Did we really need Van Helsing *and* Renfield *and*
not one; not two; but three of Lucy's suitors?  Is Jonathan Harker
(Keanu Reeves) important at all?  If not, why does he dominate the first
half of the film?  If so, why is he literally abandoned halfway through?
Coppola doesn't seem to know; worse, he doesn't seem to care.  And by
the end of the film, neither do we.
     It may be that Coppola started down this road with good intentions;
after all, it's hard to believe that such a mess could have been made
intentionally.  Ironically, by sparing no expense in attempting to
create an up-to-date version of the Dracula tale by returning to the
original narrative, Coppola accomplished much less than Roger Corman
might have 30 years ago for over $40 million less.  His adaptations of
Edgar Allen Poe's short stories -- including the excellent THE HOUSE OF
USHER, THE PIT AND THE PENDULUM, and THE MASQUE OF THE RED DEATH -- are
as full of costumes and over-the-top acting as Coppola's big- budget
kitschfest; but where Coppola lost himself in the techniques of horror
filmmaking like a kid in a -- very expensive -- candy store, Corman
always knew what was most important and what safely could be offered up
as a sacrifice to the gods of low-budget filmmaking.  Expensive special
effects were never an option for Corman, but sound screenplays and good
performances were, and he never willingly stinted on those.  As a
result, Corman's Poe adaptations are as beautiful, as watchable, and as
effective today as they were almost three decades ago.  And whereas
these films remain among the very best of his work, Coppola's
kitchen-sink adaptation of Stoker's tale will likely be forgotten six
months after its inevitable video release.
     In fact, it's already seeming a little hazy to the Phantom, though
then again, that could have more to do with the Dristan than the film
itself.  Perhaps the Phantom's best advice to his phans would be to
avoid operating heavy machinery after watching DRACULA, and to
discontinue use and sneak into ALADDIN in the theater next door if
disorientation sets in.  DRACULA is this season's most expensive
prescription for disappointment, and the Phantom can only hope that its
success does not lead to a wave of similarly sloppy and ineffective
"horror" films in the months and years to come.

Author
Jerry Saravia
The 1922 silent masterpiece "Nosferatu," and its 1979 remake by Herzog are
clearly the most lucid, atmospheric interpretations of the famous novel by
Bram Stoker. There have been several remakes and sequels in their wake, so
why keep remaking the oft-told story? We all know it by heart. Francis
Ford Coppola's "Bram Stoker's Dracula" is a visual mess - an overblown,
campy knock off of the legend. That's not to say that it isn't fun.
Coppola's "Dracula" starts off promisingly for the first half-hour
complete with silhouettes, shadows, irises, beautiful if ostentatious
imagery, and really fancy camera tricks, especially when we first visit
Dracula's castle. Some of this represents of Coppola's best directorial
work ever, but he screws up when he doesn't take the legend seriously.
The acting is uneven throughout. Gary Oldman ("J.F.K") plays Dracula
fairly straight with an astonishing array of body movements and language
(he's a bloodsucking, white-haired, venemous creature in the beginning) but his
performance lacks passion and verve. Keanu Reeves as Jonathan Harker is
merely incompetent and unbelievable in a period setting - he reminded me
too much of his Bill and Ted antics. Sir Anthony Hopkins overacts to the
hilt as Professor Van Helsing, and has a moment where he smells Mina's
fragrance reminding one of Hannibal Lecter. Winona Ryder, however, steals
the movie as Mina (Harker's sweetie), and she is appropriately passionate
and sexy, especially in the love scenes.
As incredibly flawed as "Dracula" is, it somehow works in the big
egostistical way that some of Coppola's lesser efforts have. At times
resembling more of a horror spoof, it is extraordinarily well-made and the
snowy climax at Drac's castle is terrific, suspenseful stuff.
Unfortunately, dear old Francis leaves so little to the imagination and
the gore is piled on scene after scene with none of the cold, chilling
atmosphere of "Nosferatu" or Lugosi's "Dracula."
Over-the-top, overstuffed, overdone and undernourished in character
details, "Dracula" is never boring and somehow fun in a crude way. This
Count does not suck, but he occasionally does bite.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, concerns or complaints at jerry@movieluver.com or
at Faust667@aol.com

Author
Jason D Corley
     It's 1460.  ("I'll attack any Church for $14.60!")   Constantinople
(not Istanbul).  A guy that looks about as much like a 15th Century
Romanian warlord as Bella Abzug (Ryan interjects: "Well, he did look a
lot like Bella Abzug later in the movie") has a tearful farewell with
Winona Ryder (Ryder rents movie services!) and the audience is
bewildered.  Are we supposed to care?  Anyway, he rides out past a bunch
of silhouettes that then start running each other through with cardboard
poles and pretending to be killed in a sort of mime show.  The only
thing missing is the guy pretending to be in a shrinking box.  Then
after killing about 500,000 people singlehandedly, Bella Abzug kisses
this big-ass medallion it looks like he stole from L. L. Cool J., and
that's supposed to impress the audience and make it all better.  So he
goes back to the model of the castle, but first they have to push a
dressmaker's dummy with Winona's wig on out of a window and watch it
fall really stiffly into a matte painting of a chasm.  I'm surprised
they didn't show it break apart on the rocks.  So he gets there and lo
and behold it's a miracle, she's fallen fifty miles and there isn't a
scratch on her except she smeared her lipstick, but she should have
known better than to try to put it on on the way down.  He picks up a
letter that says he may already have won, screams, "I hate Ed McMahon!"
and discusses religion with these grey-haired Ewoks for a while.  Then
he stabs his sword into the middle of this wood cross for no apparent
reason and ketchup starts squirting out of it, along with cherry Jell-O
mix and water with red food coloring in it.  (A lot of it, Ryan says,
real mess.)  So he goes up and starts swilling it down.  Now the only
thing I'm thinking here is, "Cholesterol.  He's gonna have such clogged
arteries," and WHAMMO!  We're four centuries in the future and all of
those carefully crafted and individualized characters are dead except
for Dracula.
     Ryan turns to me (in the theatre) and says, "So we're about half
an hour through this one, right?" and I say, "No, man, that was just
the prologue," and he says, "Aaaah."  
     So when we look back at the screen, some guy that looks vaguely
like Barton Fink is eating flies.  He does a pretty good job, I suppose,
but we have NO IDEA WHAT THE HECK THIS HAS TO DO WITH ANYTHING!  
     So then Ted "Theodore" Logan gets sent out to do Barton Fink's job
by a guy with big huge whiskers and a big bald head.  "Excellent!"  I
say in the theatre.  (Ryan later says, What was the point of that?  I
mean, I wouldn't send Ted on a financial mission ... I wouldn't trust him
to pick up a paper at 7-11!  I said Strange things are afoot at the
7-11.)  So off goes Ted to say goodbye to his babe girlfriend.  Ryan
claims Winona was "pumped up" for this movie, but I think they just
didn't make her wear all those ... restraints ... Victorian women really
had to wear (Later, Ryan would comment, The raw sexuality of Victorian
England!)  So she's been looking at old Playboy "Best of ..." leather-
bound collections and cooing over them with the Slut o' The Century, so
she's hot to trot.  So she drags him off into the garden to smooch a
while, but later claims that they've "only kissed" (Yeah, Ryan says, but
only kissed *what*?)  
     So off he goes, writing in his diary the whole 3 day trip and
complaining about the food and the runs I suppose, like all English
people do when they go abroad, but he writes very well considering he's
riding on a bumpy train, I mean he never even smears his ink *once* (I'm
bitter.  I can't do that with *my* fountain pens...).  These huge eyes
appear in the sky but he doesn't pay attention to them because they
obviously have cataracts and couldn't see a thing anyway.  The eyes pop
up again and again, but nobody ever says anything about them.  My
personal theory: it's Ross Perot, because in one of the scenes I think I
saw a gigantic pair of ears to match.
     So anyway he gets dropped off by this carriage with someone wearing
so many necklaces ... well, actually it's probably L. L. Cool J. back for
revenge!  L. L. Cool J. gives Ted a crucifix and says, "Wear all you
want, we'll make more."  So Ted kind of stands there and the carriage
takes off like a bat out of hell and once they're off-screen they say
"Man!  That was close!  We almost had to stay in that crappy movie!"  So
Ted just stands there.  In the theatre, Ryan says, "So, I guess I'll
just wait here then."  And then the wolves howl a bit and then they howl
a lot and Ted sees them kind of trotting through the underbrush like
he's Marlon Perkins on "Wild Kingdom."  And the whole thing turns into a
PBS special on wolves for a little while until another carriage shows up
and a guy with 9 foot long arms and Lee Press-On Claws pushes Ted into
the carriage.  It takes off, goes ninety miles an hour (despite the fact
that it's horse-drawn) along a two-inch wide road next to that same
matte painting of a chasm and eventually it passes through a bath of
ultraviolet light, apparently Dracula has installed a clean room
somewhere out there in the Romanian wilderness, and then these huge
portculli slam shut and Ted says, "Bogus."  And then he gets out of the
carriage and the driver takes off with his luggage because Ted didn't
tip enough.  So he goes up to the doors, that open before he gets there.
Doors do that a lot, but does he say anything about it?  No.  Does he
act surprised at all?  No.  Does he even comment on the draft?  No.
Does he immediately try to call Bill and Rufus and tell them to get
their butts out here like he should?  No.
     What does he do, he goes on inside and sits down across from
Dracula, Prince of the Vampires, you know how we know he's the Prince?
Because he *dresses* like Prince, with this big huge crimson wedding
dress, without a veil, that goes on and on and on and leaves the room at
least fifteen minutes after he does.  And Gary Oldman has so much makeup
on he always looks like Worf trying to emote.  And we won't even mention
his haircut except for the rather obvious comment that if he put on a
hat and cut off that ponytail he would look like John Carradine in Kung
Fu, but without that he looks like a cross between Telly Savalas, Cher
and a bottle of Tide Extra Strength Bleach.  So they banter a little
while and Oldman gives us his impersonation of Bela Lugosi's accent,
which, though real, sounded as phony as Michael Jackson's nose.  Then we
get some really neat shadow special effects (Ryan says, I can make a
bunny!) but unfortunately they are never referred to and even occur
when Oldman's not even in the *country*, as we see when we go to the
party scene.
     Now I am the first guy to admit that I like parties.  I like them
in movies too.  But lets get one thing straight--my idea of a party is
not one in which Winona Ryder stands on the side of the room and watches
Slut-O-Matic reject three losers simultaneously ... and that's the only
thing that happens at this one.  We are introduced to three guys just
long enough to know that we dislike and don't care about any of them,
and then we get a dramatic closeup on Winona's face as the shadow puppet
does its thing again, and we never get to see what happens to the rest
of the party because of a strange dream sequence of Ted's in which we
get to see Winona and the Sultaness of Slut share some tonsils in the
garden and Winona run up and down in her nightshirt.  Now, we haven't
got to the part where she *really is* running around in her nightshirt
so this is totally gratuitous.
     Anyway, Ted wakes up and there's a really good shaving scene, which
is unfortunate because it immediately ends and we cut to Winona and the
"Filmed in Slut-O-Rama" girl in the garden reading Ted's letter, and IT
says, "You may already have won."  But that's okay, because Slutbo is
*marrying* Ed McMahon, or it might be Ed McMahon, as far as the audience
knows BECAUSE WE DON'T KNOW ENOUGH ABOUT THOSE GUYS LAST NIGHT TO TELL
THEM APART!!!!!!!!!!!!
     So, then we have some dramatic closeups of Ted as he wanders around
specifically where Oldman told him not to go (good one, Gary), and he
goes in and lies down in a room where it looks like Michaelangelo's been
doing some painting, because there's dropcloths on the floor and naked
women coming up out of them.  So Ted's thinking, "All right, dude!" and
about to do the air guitar, when the girls grow fangs, melt L. L. Cool
J.'s crucifix and make him say, "Bogus!"  He's really getting into it,
though, so just as the women close in for the kill (buck-a-woowwww
chicka chicka), in floats Oldman like a shrivelled-up prune on wires,
sort of a Peter Pan type thing and says, "Get off him; he's mine," which
itself conjures up many images, none of them pretty.  While the
audience's mind is preoccupied with these images, Dracula throws a baby
to the women, but we don't get to see much, just a dramatic closup of
Ted getting closer and closer up until we are sure that we will be
seeing the rest of the movie in Nostril-Vision, and then it cuts off and
goes back to London.
     Actually, that's not totally accurate.  We get back to London in a
burst of jump cuts, filtered backgrounds and fade-outs and some really
weird pictures of the zoo, with animals jumping around and cats and dogs
living together and some otherwise innocent lemurs temporarily trapped
in this stinker of celluloid (The lemur was of course the famous
ringtail lemur actor Lionel the Leaping Lemur of London) and then
there's a little narration about daylight and just then (like we weren't
*even* expecting it) Dracula bursts out of a crate and Ryan says
"Ewww ... he awakes with the worst face of the morning."  Shouldn't have
flown Southwest, buddy.
     That night, we finally get to see Winona Ryder run down some stairs
in the rain in her see-through nightgown into the garden after
OctoSlutty wanders out in kind of a daze.  As she bounces down the
steps, I say, "Ow!  Ow!  Ooouch!  OOh!  Wish Ouch!  They had Ouch!
invented sport bras!  Ouch!  Ow!".  So then she runs up and down and
eventually she comes across living proof that Slutzilla will go out with
anyone, 'cause she's making the sign of the three-humped camel with The
Cowardly Lion, and he turns around and sums up the whole film in one
line: "Do not see me!"
     But no!  No!  We're only halfway through!  We've still got the
Knee-Level Dachsund Cam that goes in fast motion until you get motion
sickness and by God Coppola says, "We bought the thing and we're gonna
use it!"
     Meanwhile, Ted is back at the castle, getting slobbered over by the
three topless babes, but he still thinks it's bogus just because he has
to give a little blood.  Later, Hopkins asks him, "Did you at any time
taste any of their blood?" and Ted says, "No way dude!" and Ryan says
"So what exactly *did* you taste then?"  But anyway he gets up on the
roof of the castle and re-enacts the dress dummy sequence from the first
part of the movie in case anyone's forgotten it now that we've only seen
it three times, but he doesn't smear his lipstick because he's a
professional.  Suddenly we're watching a wilderness survival flick and
he stumbles into a convent where we don't get to watch the spankings.
     So the nuns write Winona a letter telling her that she may already
be a winner because there's this guy that claims to be Ed McMahon that
wants to marry her and if she can just hop on the Concorde and get to
Romania by that evening they can be married at the same time Tonsil
Juggler Lucy gets offed so Coppola can have his little artistic orgasm
with splicing back and forth between flowers and old men saying, "No
purchase necessary to enter" in Latin and the ketchup all over the
place.
     But first while Winona is in the air swilling down champagne and
eating caviar somewhere over the Carpathians, Anthony Hopkins (who is
great mugging at the camera) comes in, opens Wilma Slutstone's mouth and
says, "Good Lord, look at that!" and I say, "Cavities!  We're gonna have
to drill."  But he means the oversized plastic teeth she's wearing from
last Halloween.  The fiancee says, "You gotta get those things out
before my wedding night!" and the Texan says, "Wimp!"  Anyway they
decide to stand guard after Hopkins pulls a little David Copperfield
stunt on them to prove what idiots they all are.  The fiancee goes on a
binge with a *huge* bottle of whiskey and the Texan stands outside with
a rifle and looks manly.  Then we get the Scottish Terrier Cam
"sneaking" up on the Texan, who can't see it because it's hiding under
the cover of a lot of air, and then it *charges* and the Texan who we
believe is a real stud (up until now) *misses* at point-blank range with
his rifle.  So the thing crashes through the door and knocks the fiancee
aside (like it really needed to, he'd taken enough booze to knock out a
horse), and chats with Slutterwoman a bit, and then makes the ketchup
pipes burst I guess, because the furniture starts spraying goo all over
the place.
     Then at the funeral, somber music plays, and everyone gathers
around like the end of an Agatha Christie novel, like we're really
supposed to care that someone that would be slutty regardless of what
*species* someone was, let alone sex or personality went and got herself
blown up.  "Good thing she's hermetically sealed," Ryan said.  "Well,
that could have gone better," I said, imitating the fiancee's voice.
Ryan as Texan: "Well if you hadn'ta been drinkin' ...."  Me as fiancee:
"Well, you're the one who missed ...."  Ryan as Texan: "Oh, that's
right, I'm the jerk, she's *your* crappy girlfriend ..." but by this
time the camera has panned off this heartwrenching scene and Hopkins
livens up the movie with another great line about disemboweling.  It was
really good, and Ryan and I applauded it.
     So anyway, Loosey's dead ... or is she?  (Who *cares*?  But I
digress....)  And we get some gratuitous scenes of the Doctor shooting
up morphine ... though maybe that was earlier, Jeez, what am I trying
to do, find continuity in this yawnfest?  Anyway, so the guys magically
realise through the power of Francis Ford Coppola that Fondle Woman is
still going around and sucking things but do they tell the audience
this?  NOOOOooo....  They just start opening up tombs at random and
bitching about how emotionally difficult this is for them.  They also
act by staring into the camera for long periods of time and waving guns
around.  Pretty impressive, really.  Oscar-award-winning stuff here.
*anyway*, so they undo her little Ziploc coffin and lo and behold it's
empty except for her dress which she never takes anywhere anyway.  Then
they hear her coming down the stairs, and she uses her Clapper to turn
on the candles.  They know it's her because they canceled the newspaper
to her tomb and the milk delivery doesn't come until morning.  So she
comes in with this little androgynous kid-thing, sort of a small white
Michael Jackson with curly hair, and the audience is supposed to care,
but we really don't get to see much of him/her/it at all because it
immediately gets dropped on the floor and one of the equally anonymous
men grabs it up and disappears from the screen we hope forever but we
can't really be sure.  So Kung-Fu Grip G. I. Josephine decides that
she's in trouble (she shouldn't have dropped the kid, he/she/it was her
only weapon) and she reacts first by breathing at them ("Phew!  Who died
in here?") and secondly by how she reacts to every situation, by trying
to grope the nearest thing with recognizable genitalia.  He just stands
there like a dope (everyone acts like a dope around her, but we don't
know if this is because of Tongue-alina or because the movie itself is a
soporific) until she starts snarling, but usually she gets at least
*some* of their clothes off, and most of hers before she reaches this
stage, so Hopkins pulls a cross and starts shouting.  That's okay
because the music is playing so loud you can barely hear him say, "Get
away from him, you *bitch*!  And take that off!"  Eventually she gets
tired of it and lays down.  Pretty convenient, too, because otherwise
that stake and mallet they brought along would have been pretty useless.
There's a lot more ketchup around by the time this scene is over, as
Anonymous Man #1 sings, "I've been workin' on the railroad," and pounds
away like one of the roustabouts in Dumbo.
     So what I'm wondering is, "Are we gonna have to have another
funeral?" but apparently one is enough even for Coppola, so instead
everything gets real jerky and we get to watch Dracula in his
Transformer-Suave mode meet Winona.  They go to watch some snuff flicks,
but when she puts up resistance, he calls Lassie.  "What's that girl?
Vlad is trapped in Deadrock Canyon?  Can't get anywhere with Winona or
her two allegedly recently expanded talents?  Quick, go let her run her
hands through your hair!  Go on Girl!"  ('cause if there's anything
chicks dig, it's dog fur.)
     Now we're about halfway through this stupendously long seduction
sequence when I start to wonder: "So ....just exactly how much *unlike*
Bram Stoker's Dracula is this movie going to be?"  They keep waltzing
across a Police video and staring into the camera instead of at each
other.  Doesn't sound like any seduction *I've* ever hear of.  There's
also some crap about Winona being some reincarnation of the dress dummy
they threw out the castle window four hundred years ago, but in the
novel, the dress dummy was celibate so I don't buy it.
     'Round about this time, Anthony Hopkins and the Duke boys decided
to show old Boss Hogg what exorcism was all about.  Ted eats dinner and
is just a regular stool pigeon about the extensive Romanian dirt
smuggling ring that crisscrosses London.  And Hopkins goes to the Police
video and reads one of his vampire books while, you guessed it, staring
into the camera.  (Ryan: "Jeez, you got enough light in there?  What do I
look like, a fucking *candle* factory?")  So they drop by the place which
just *happens* to be right next door to Barton Fink's cell, so that he
can yell at them that "Tresspassers will be Prosecuted".  He is obviously
insane.
     Of course this is no place for women, which is why Winona came
along, I guess, but it was probably just to get her to go into the
asylum with the doctor who promptly says, "This is no place for a
woman."  So why did you bring her there, Dr.  Kevorkian?
Hmmmmm????????  She has a deep and meaningful conversation with Barton
Fink, in which they discover they are actually brother and sister and
Darth Vader is their father.  She also asks him, "Give me his *name*,
Dr. Lecter," in a rather gripping ... oh, wait, no ... sorry, those
were from the identical scenes in good movies.  Anyway, so she just pops
right into the good Dr.'s bedroom and put on his filmy frilly lacy
teddie and goes to bed.  Luckily the door suddenly becomes very thick so
that it now blocks the screams of the lunatics so that the music can be
heard, such as it is.  She naturally falls asleep immediately.
     Next door at the Cleaver home, the boys are bustin' up boxes and
spreading that illegal Romanian dirt around and turning on the sprinkler
system and Hopkins is chanting something like "I'm not gonna pay a lot
for this muffler," while swinging a cross around like a baseball bat
and Coppola gives us a real interesting shot of a green thing up in the
rafters ("I'm Batman!") which promptly turns into a horny green mist
that rockets down the road, zig-zagging like an escaped special effect
from the Disney film SOMETHING WICKED THIS WAY COMES.  
     So Winona's lying there (on her back, of course, since she can't
fit into the bed any other way) and in comes the St. Patrick's Day dry
ice which is supposed to look spooky I guess [snort], and it kinda flows
up under the covers and WHAMMO! Winona is ridin' high!  Molested by
mist.  Violated by vapour.  Seduced by smoke.  Fondled by fog.  Rather
disappointingly, it turns into Gary "Go to bed" Oldman, who promptly
takes off his shirt (see, he *is* Prince) and they have a little
domestic dispute about who's gonna be sucking whose blood.  Eventually
Winona wins out and starts sucking him off (in a nice way, I mean).
     Enter the Three Stooges ("Helloooo" "Helloooooo" "Hellooooooooo"
"HELLO!") and their agent, Anthony Hopkins.  They look and see Winona
sucking away at thin air and the Doctor immediately slaps his head and
says, "I knew I forgot to lock the morphine cabinet!" but then Dracula,
in his big rubbery suit phase pops up out of nowhere, takes a few
bullets and grunts at them for a while.  Though every character in the
movie seems to understand him fine, unfortunately the audience is a bit
left out.  It mainly goes: ANON MAN #2: "What are you?"  DRACULA SUIT:
"Erruunnghan."  JASON: "I'm Batman, I told you!"  (It goes on like that
until people are shouting at the screen "Get on with it!")  So Dracula
finally takes the hint and lets all the gerbils out of his suit and they
all run away to find some yellow plastic tube maze somewhere.  Nobody
thinks to call Orkin, nooooo.  They decide they're gonna chase after
him.  Does anyone think to take the magickal way Winona got to Romania
in *one night*???  No, they take a train.  On the way Winona is gettin'
scarier and scarier to the characters on the train and stupider and
stupider to the audience.  She starts displaying her Halloween plastic
teeth too.
     So they make it (in a thrilling map scene) to this port city where
they slap their heads and say, "Doohhh!  He passed us in the night!  We
probably should have gotten off the train instead of waiting for the
ship to sail through the passenger car!"  So the Anonynmous Men take
some horses and ride off, starting another thrilling map scene, and
Hopkins decides to take a road trip, just him and Winona, heh heh heh
(bompa chicka-wowoowwwwooowwww bompa).
     First we see their cozy little home life, sitting around the
Campfire and Winona does her Floocy impression because the triplets are
out there somewhere and there's romance in the air.  Hopkins spoils the
mood by yelling, "Oxycute 'em!" and pressing a medicated pad into
Winona's forehead ("It tingles!"  "That means it's working.") and
setting that highly flammable *snow* on fire in a little circle around
them.
     Next we get a chase scene filmed in Confus-O-Vision with the
Anonymous Men chasing after Even More Anonymous People Who We Have No
Idea Who They Are Because We've Never Seen Or Heard Of Them Before But
We Know They're Bad Because The Anonymous Men We *Do* Know Are Shooting
At Them And Because They Are Smuggling Dirt Back *Into* Romania.  For
some reason they've got to get to Dracula's little crate before the sun
goes down, mainly because there's no narrator in this scene to remind
Dracula that he doesn't need to just sit there, which he does for
probably a full twenty minutes of footage, every so often.
     Meanwhile, Hopkins is practicing a little trick he saw on Julia
Child's show and whacking up the Big Sluts into Little Pieces of Veal
Slutlet and throwing them into the matte painting.  Just in case anyone
forgot what it looked like.
     And while he's off doing that Winona decides she's gonna try a
little Sigfried and Roy of her own, so she climbs up on a styrofoam
boulder left over from the old "Star Trek" show and cues the UV light
around Drac's castle, which immediately sets off the sunset stock
footage we've been seeing at different parts through the whole movie.
Even though the sun is dropping behind the mountain four or five times
in a row, everyone puts the accelerator to the floor and manages to
reach the castle just in time for Anonymous Man #2 (Texan) to get offed
in a big Kung-Fu fight scene.  As in all good kung-fu fight scenes he
lives long enough for a doctor to shake his head sadly even though the
doctor is busy for the rest of the scene which is about fifteen minutes
long and he got knifed in the first twelve *seconds*.  To sum up: Drac
gets a knife in the chest and a cut to the throat.  Anon. Man #2
finally dies and Winona comes in in her Rifle Packin' Mama mode and
says, "Will you guys end this stupid scene already?  And will you do the
same for me when my time comes?" to which they all reply, "We'll do it
to you whenever you want, baby."
     So she gets disgusted with them and drags Vlad inside ("Come on,
dummy") and there's a real tender scene where they shine a spotlight
in Oldman's face ("Where were you in 1460?") and they run the footage
from the beginning of the movie in reverse, which makes us all really
nervous because we think we're gonna have to watch the whole thing again
("Maybe it will make more sense this time").  And then there's a final
emotional parting scene where Winona pushes the knife the rest of the
way through him, twists it, and jumps up and down laughing maniacally,
then whacks off his head ("She cut off Big Jake's head!")  Her
complexion clears up a bit, showing that murder really is good for the
skin.
     And the final shot is of the ceiling mural which slowly lights up
and shows Dracula and the dress dummy in heaven.  (JASON: "Aaahhhh ...
so it was the ceiling all the time.  Now everything falls into place.  It
all makes sense now ... HUH?")
From Jason and Ryan: Direct all flames to corleyj@gas.uug.arizona.edu
so we can laugh at them.  Also, folloups to rec.arts.movies.

Author
Pedro Sena
Dracula films, have always been on the edge of showing people what exactly
they feared in their time.  During the BELA LUGOSI era, the film dealt with
the shadows and things that just seemed to lurk everywhere, which would
scare people, specially when film was such a new adventure.  By the 50's and
60's when we were introduced to the awesome battles between CHRISTOPHER LEE,
and PETER CUSHING, the films begun to take on a new tone, that of the gory
details of death, and the more sexually promiscuous side of things.  And for
the 90's, the film story has progressed from the gory and the specially
disgusting, to the elements which we understand very little of, but which
are a big part of it all.  This Dracula, has desires, and his shadow lives
them, right in front of us, though these bits are subtle, but obvious.  He
also has something which the novel does not get into.  He is now a full
story, a true love story, as opposed to an evil entity, who has an acute
thirst for life.
The novel by Abraham Stoker, is exceptional, in that it is a series of diary
letters between Jonathan Harker, Lucy and Mina Murray.  And what brings
Dracula to London, is not quite clear, since the story is never seen from
the Count's point of view.  This film, almost exclusively, lets us know the
story from the Count's feelings, and what has led him to London, which was
undoubtedly his inner feeling that he had to move, only to discover that the
reason to move to London was because the incarnation of his beloved is the w
oman who is about to marry the real estate agent who is closing the deals on
Carfax Abbey.
All of a sudden we have a love story, and when the injured Count finally
asks his beloved to 'save' his life, she does, and releases him to the
spheres.  The new problem is that Mina will not be able to have
a satisfying life with her beloved, but the chances that a sequel will
follow are nil, and none.  The Count's tale is over, though he has not been
able to meet up with his beloved as he wished.
In many ways, it was a sign of things to come, if this were the novel that
Abraham ( Bram ) Stoker wrote.  The lessons of love are no longer dependant
on the past lives, and the beings merely interact without thought to
anything else.  Were they able to do so, their lives would be fulfilled and
much more satisfying than what is evident.
In between, the film pretty much dwells on the part of the Count which we
can least explain, or understand.  The novel always suggested his bat, wolf,
and mist life ( quite a shaman ), but never could delve very much into it.
This film, unlike the previous ones, gets into it full blast, even if it
isn't quite right.  Lucy is being ravaged in a dream stupor, by a being that
looks like a wolf, and she is enjoying it.  The feral Count is insatiable,
and does what it has to, so it can get to his real target, which in this
film is Mina.
The other well done thing in this film, is that it finally, for the first
time, looks at the country side, and London, as it may have appeared, at the
time of the turn of the century, rather than the almost/quasi
medieval look which it always had in the many films prior to this one.  We
see the trains, and a much more modern London, with an upper class  that is
entering the 20th century, rather than earlier in time.  And this upper
crust of a class has some education, and is less driven by emotional
standards, which the other films worked on in detail.   Lugosi's film
appears very dated.  Lee's films always had a bit of the  18th and 19th
centuries feeling to them and never delved beyond that.  ( I have never
found the Spanish version of DRACULA with CHRISTOPHER LEE, which is said to
be 100% like the book, with absolutely no deviations.. directed by the famed
director Mario Bava. )
With an excellent cast, and well directed, this film is actually less scary
than it is beautiful to watch.  Excellent music replaces the shock horror
classic music of the likes of Charles Martell and company that always scared
us in the Hammer Films.  And a superb costume and make up job, keeps us very
much wondering what will come next, which is actually a pleasant surprise
next to the other films.  And yes, unlike the previous films, there is also
a bit more skin to be shown in this film.  But it is well done, and never
mis-used.

Author
Robert Dorsett
     Gary Oldman stars as the vampire, who's been simmering away in his
castle for several hundred years.  He invites Jonathan Harker (Keanu
Reeves) to his castle in Transylvania, to sign and deliver a real estate
deal: the count wants to move to London (happy hunting grounds?).  While
Harker is there, the Count learns of the existence of Mina (Winona
Ryder), who is Harker's fiance, but who also bears an uncanny
resemblance to the count's betrothed, who died in tragic circumstances,
several hundred years earlier.  The count feels his  destiny drawing him
to London; the rest of the movie revolves around (a) his attempts to
seduce Mina, (b) the vampire-killer Van Helsing's (Anthony Hopkins)
attempts to find and kill him, (c) Harker's attempts to escape from the
er, vamps holding him in the castle, and (d) a major plot-crisis
involving Mina's somewhat ah, flirtatious friend, Lucy.
     Before proceeding, let me confess that I've never read Stoker's
novel, which the hype says this movie is faithful to.  Maybe it is,
maybe it isn't.  I don't know.  I have seen just about all the *movies*,
though, my favorite of which, by far, is the Frank Langella version.
Just so you know where I'm coming from.
     So, does this one work?  Not really.  It's an attractive movie, but
very choppy; several audience members confessed to some confusion, after
it, as to what they had just seen.  Some scenes are just plain BAD
(especially the opening scenes introducing Mina and Lucy), so contrived
that it's embarrassing to see them included.
     I didn't see much in this movie that lived up to its hype (net or
otherwise).  When I think "Dracula," I think three things: "tragedy,"
"love story," and "horror," in about that order.  This movie reversed
the priority, and didn't really make much of the first element, until
the *very* end.
     I would suggest that for a Dracula movie to work, you have to have
a sympathetic vampire.  And this vampire wasn't sympathetic.  By playing
up the horror, they had to de-humanize the vampire: the movie deals more
with Mina than Dracula.  And Mina's a fairly one-dimensional character.
     The problem is, the horror didn't really work: it was more
repulsive than frightening; Lucy wasn't a particularly endearing
character to get worked up about, and Mina was a tad bit whiny; Harker's
exploits were of interest, but his eventual escape just wasn't terribly
believable.  Even Hopkins's Van Helsing fell flat, his flippant remarks
in "polite" company about chopping off heads and removing hearts quickly
becoming old (very nice sense of menace, though, as to what he MIGHT do
if the various characters didn't answer his casual questions in just the
right way).  Perhaps I'm getting old, but I'm just not impressed by
crosses spurting blood, or latex masks, anymore: effective horror
movies, to me, emphasize the monsters *within* men (or women).
     The music is monotonous, and doesn't help the story along any: this
is an opera, but only has episodic theme music.
     How about the cinematography?  It is unique; I'll give it that, and
often visually attractive.  Did it help the story along, any?  Not
reaaaaally.  
     Acting?  I don't see why people are commenting about Reeves: he was
perfectly adequate for the part.  Hopkins was interesting, but a bit
flat.  Oldman had a great deal of fun as Dracula, but, again, failed to
convey that essential "something" to divide our loyalties between him
and the "good guys."
     So what did this movie add to the canon?  Namely: the nature of
Dracula's fall from grace, and his intense interest in Mina.  Dracula is
also explicitly identified as Vlad the Impaler (the "Draculs" were a
line of "defenders of Christianity," who were "betrayed" by the church).
The aggressiveness of Mina's behavior late in the movie was of interest,
but the metaphysical relationship between her and her predecessor (and
why she apparently *rationally* found the vampire so interesting) was
not well established.  Of particular interest is how Vlad's trial as a
vampire ultimately ends in absolution, thus giving a meaning, of sorts,
to all the madness...
     It is worth seeing.   The second half is much better than the first
half; if the quality of the last 30 minutes had been sustained for the
rest of the movie, this would be very good, indeed.  2.5 stars (out of
four), +1 on the [-4,+4] scale, a 5 on the 0-10 scale.  Catch it
matinee.

Author
Alex Ioshpe
Once upon a time, there was a brave prince, who was of the sacred order of
the dragon, known as Dracula (Gary Oldman ). He humbly served the cross,
defeating all the enemies of Christ. His name was Vlad. He lived happily in
his beautiful castle with his beloved wife, Elizabeta (Wiona Ryder ), who he
priced above all things on earth.
At that time, Muslim Turks swept into Europe, threatening all Christianity.
Vlad marched out to meet the warriors in battle and defeat them. He was
victorious. But the evil Turks shot an arrow into his castle, carrying false
news - that the prince has fallen. Elizabeta, believing his death, threw
herself into the river. When Vlad returned home, he found his beloved
princess dead in his chapel. He then addressed God, whom he has served and
worshiped his entire life: "Is this how you repay me?!....I denie You...I
will arise from my grave and revenge her death with all the powers of
darkness...Her blood is now my life! "
That is how the sweet prince became the servant of darkness, cursed to walk
in the shadow of death for all eternity. His beautiful castle turned into
prison, his heavenly land into hell and his life into nightmare...
Four centuries later, somewhere at the end of the 18th century, company
envoy Jonathan Harker (Keanue Reeves) visits Dracula's nightmarish castle to
discuss the old vampire's London landholdings. When Dracula sees a
photograph of Harker's fiancee Mina, (likewise played by Wiona Ryder), he
tearfully realizes the apparent reincarnation of his princess. "Do you
believe in destiny?", he asks Harker, "..that even the powers of time can be
altered for one single purpose?...The happiest man that walks this earth is
the one that finds true love...". From that point Dracula uses all the
powers of darkness to reclaim his long lost bride...He travels to London,
leaving three half-naked female vampires to feed on Harker's blood.
Meanwhile, staid and proper Mina waits for Harker by moving in with her best
friend Lucy (Sadie Frost), a wild, fresh aristocrat with three suitors, an
English gentleman (Cary Elwes), a homily-spouting Texan(Bill Campbell ) and
the aforementioned Dr. Seward (Richard E. Grant ). Before recapturing
Mina/Elisabeta's heart, Dracula entices Lucy, to become one of his fellow
night creatures - a disciple of Darkness..      Despite the best efforts of
her suitors and the metaphysical specialist Professor Abraham Van Helsing
(Anthony Hopkins), Lucy succumbs to her incurable malady. Van Helsing leads
the effort to stop Dracula's draw on Mina. It's a foray that mixes
state-of-the-art ghoulish effects with '50s-style movie fog, high humor and
intense emotions.
Oldman's Dracula appears in a number of forms, some enhanced by creative and
no doubt uncomfortable makeup. But while he's convincing in all of them,
he's most impressive as the young Dracula. Seductive and attentive, he has
everything it takes to create Dracula's overwhelming personality.
Wiona Ryder is the otherwise dependable and sensible Mina, mysteriously
drown to the charming foreigner in Jonathan's absence. She is constantly
searching for her true self, at last realizing that she is the reincarnated
spirit of Dracula's beloved princess, she is caught between two worlds of
which she must choose one. It's an appropriately adult turn for Ryder, who
manages to make you forget her gawky teen roles.
Hopkins provides comic relief and explanations as Dracula's nemesis Van
Helsing. It isn't a large role, but it gets the biggest laughs. Reeves does
all right as the serious young man of the future. His recognizable dry
acting is here at its place, but he easily could have been replaced by any
number of actors.
Francis Ford Cappola's picture is structured as Stoker's novel - with
fragments from the diaries of the main characters. That way we get their
true feelings, thoughts and emotions. Both the film's synopses and visual
appearence are specifically made as a fairytail. The sudden transformation
of Dracula's beautiful castle and heavenly land into the frightening
darkness reminds of the classic fairytail "Beauty and the Beast". From the
dark, gothic forests of Transylvania, "..where Devil and his children walk
the earth with earthly feet..", to the beautifully recreated streets of
victorian London, "Dracula" is undescribably beautiful. The production- and
costume design, art direction, makeup, musical score and interesting visual
effects are wonderful and could not be better.
"Bram Stoker's Dracula" is a visually stunning fairytail for grownups. It's
about prince and his princess, the eternal conflict between good and evil
and how good always prevails. It's about war with God, about love, fate and
destiny...
Review written by Alex Ioshpe ">ioshpe@online.no>

Author
Brian L. Johnson
130 min., R, Horror/Drama, 1992
Director: Francis Ford Coppola
Cast:  Gary Oldman, Winona Ryder, Anthony Hopkins, Keanu Reeves,
       Richard E. Grant, Cary Elwes, Bill Campbell, Sadie Frost,
       Tom Waits
     BRAM STOKER'S DRACULA appears to be a true adaptation of Bram
Stoker's novel.  Keanu Reeves is sent to Transylvania to close a
real estate deal with Count Dracula, Gary Oldman.  Oldman, unknown to
Reeves, is an undead bloodsucker.  Oldman is interested in Reeve's
girlfriend Winona Ryder, and travels to London to get her.  Oldman is
hunted by slightly nutty doctor Anthony Hopkins.
     DRACULA, despite a few technical mistakes, is a very good film.
I feel that it is worth the admission price and well worth going to see
before it leaves the theaters.  On a scale of zero to five, I give
BRAM STOKER'S DRACULA a four.  DRACULA is rated R for female nudity,
graphic violence, and adult situations.
     The film is well written and it held my attention throughout.  I
read the book DRACULA many years ago, so I am not that familiar with
the way the book goes, but from what I could remember, the film seems to
follow the novel.  I was surprised to see that DRACULA is rather
"arty" in many places.  I feel that at least hose of you who tend to
enjoy "art" films might want to go to a matinee of BRAM STOKER'S
DRACULA.   I enjoyed the effect this had on the film.
     The acting in this film was very well done.  Gary Oldman did a
great job as the undead bloodsucker.  He was very convincing in
his role and brings life to the film.  Keanu Reeves (BILL AND TED'S
EXCELLENT ADVENTURE, POINT BREAK, BABES IN TOYLAND [1986 television
film]) is an interesting choice as an actor to portray Jonathan
Harker.  I wouldn't have chosen him as this character, but he does a
great job.  He is on the screen considerably for the first half of the
film, then disappears for the second half.  Winona Ryder (NIGHT ON
EARTH, 1969) is excellent as Reeves' fiancee.  I feel that she is the
major attraction in this film.  Ryder is on the screen the most, I
believe.  Anthony Hopkins gives an average performance as Van
Helsing, the vampire killer.  He neither hurt, nor helped the film.
     The sets that are used for the film are, for the most part, great.
The one part that I really didn't like was the train ride.  I felt that
that looked too unrealistic and cheap.  The interior of the castle was
especially well done, I feel.  I think that the special effects are very
well done.  I liked the look of the 1950s horror films that DRACULA
has.  One of those that I enjoyed the most was the bleeding cross in the
beginning of the film.

Author
Roger Snappy Rubio
     Now I must admit I did read a lot about this movie before I went to
go see it; saw a lot of TV stuff on it, read about it in the newspaper,
read about it in magazines, even read another review about it (ack!  I
violated the ethics of all good reviewers).  So maybe I was a little
biased when I went in to see this movie.  Most movies like to embellish
or even enhance the image or the persona of the vampire in general, but
very few treat the vampire as a human being.  BRAM STOKER'S DRACULA
attempts to portray the vampire not only as a human being, but as a
tragic figure as well.  This attempted portrayal as both a human being
and a tragic figure is where I believe this film falls short.
     BRAM STOKER'S DRACULA is supposedly based on Bram Stoker's original
novel.  In the film story, Dracula is a knight called Prince Vlad the
Impaler, who comes home from battle only to find his beloved has killed
herself because she thought he was dead.  In his fury, he renounces God
and is banished to walk the Earth living only on the blood of others.
Four-hundred years later, he finds a woman who looks exactly like her,
and travels to London to see if she is the reincarnation of his beloved.
Of course, that's the story in a nutshell.  And I don't even know if
that's true to the original novel, for the following reason.
     I had heard through my 'biasing' foray to study this film before I
saw it that the screenplay was based on the novel, but during shooting
the actors pretty much had their way with the script.  Now I know movies
always allow for creative license, but I saw the original novel in a
bookstore with the movie's concrete logo on it, and another book based
on the SCREENPLAY with Gary Oldman and Winona Ryder on it.  Did they
change the story so much that they had to make a novel based on the
screenplay, or is this just some marketing technique to make more money?
Is this really Bram Stoker's incarnation or Hollywood's?  I would hate
to see Coppola stoop to Hollywood's level, even if he is bankrupt.
     I have no qualms with the movie as a whole--I hardly ever do when
Francis Ford Coppola is at the helm--but I believe this movie was a
little overdone.  Coppola tries so hard to pay homage to all the great
horror flicks of the past that in the process of paying tribute he
engages in overkill.  The same thing happened with THE GODFATHER PART
III.  This is not to say that it was not a great movie (in fact it's one
of the most beautifully filmed masterpieces I have ever seen) but did
you hear about the budget?  It was rumored at $60 million, mostly
because Coppola had to get the right shade of ivory for Al Pacino's
shirt and things like that.  The operatic climax at the end, while
trying to be suspenseful, dazzled the eye, but left the stomach settled.
And the ending!  The ending was fine, but I failed to feel as much as
the characters did.  GODFATHER III was a prime example of sentimentality
(in my humble opinion), and DRACULA is teetering on that edge.
     I think Coppola tried to do two things at the same time with
DRACULA.   He tried to make it a mainstream film, but at the same time
an art film.  In my opinion, mainstream movies leave everyone happy,
while art films leave everyone thinking.  BRAM STOKER'S DRACULA didn't
do either of these things to me, and that is where I think it falls
short.  But like I said, maybe I went into the movie biased by all I had
read and seen.  In my experience, most critics go into a movie to
criticize, not have any fun.  I try to temper my movie-viewing with a
little of both, but in this movie, I think I was left with more to
criticize than to have fun with.  The make-up was great, the story was
okay, and the acting ranged from dry to 'a-kid-in-a-candy-store'
eagerness, but it just didn't give me the chills or make me feel sad for
this poor creature stripped of his life and love.  It's great to look
at, but it's a little confused as to where it wants to go, and it
doesn't entertain.  At least it wasn't gratuitously bloody!
